Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1614
Political subdivision; employee benefit plans; requirements.

Any political subdivision may establish, participate in, and administer employee benefit plans for its employees or its employees and their dependents which will provide hospitalization, medical, surgical, dental, disability, and sickness and accident coverage or any one or more of such coverages. Such coverages shall be provided through self-funding in combination with excess insurance or through self-funding without excess insurance pursuant to subsection (4) of section 13-1622. Such coverages may include employee and dependent deductibles and copayments.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 14;

Laws 1999, LB 506, § 1.

A county is not required to establish benefit plans for its employees which will provide medical coverage. Christiansen v. County of Douglas, 288 Neb. 564, 849 N.W.2d 493 (2014).